North Dakota statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Relations and Persons
CHAPTER 14-12.2 Uniform Interstate Family Support Act

14-12.2-01. (101)
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Child” means an individual, whether over or under the age of majority, who is or is alleged to be owed a duty of support by the individual’s parent or who is or is alleged to be the beneficiary of a support order directed to the parent.

“Child support order” means a support order for a child, including a child who has attained the age of majority under the law of the issuing state or foreign country.

“Convention” means the convention on the international recovery of child support and other forms of family maintenance, concluded at The Hague on November 23, 2007.

“Duty of support” means an obligation imposed or imposable by law to provide support for a child, spouse, or former spouse, including an unsatisfied obligation to provide support.

“Foreign country” means a country, including a political subdivision thereof, other than the United States, that under its law authorizes the issuance of support orders and:

Which has been declared under the law of the United States to be a foreign reciprocating country;

Which has established a reciprocal arrangement for child support with this state as provided in section 14-12.2-20;

Which has enacted a law or established procedures for the issuance and enforcement of support orders which are substantially similar to the procedures under this chapter; or

In which the convention is in force with respect to the United States.

“Foreign support order” means a support order of a foreign tribunal.

“Foreign tribunal” means a court, administrative agency, or quasi-judicial entity of a foreign country authorized to establish, enforce, or modify support orders or to determine parentage of a child. The term includes a competent authority in a proceeding subject to sections 14-12.2-47.1 through 14-12.2-47.13, which may be a judicial or administrative authority in a proceeding in a foreign country.

“Home state” means the state or foreign country in which a child lived with a parent or a person acting as parent for at least six consecutive months immediately preceding the time of filing of a petition or comparable pleading for support and, if a child is less than six months old, the state or foreign country in which the child lived from birth with any of them. A period of temporary absence of any of them is counted as part of the six-month period or other period.

“Income” includes earnings or other periodic entitlements to money from any source and any other property subject to withholding for support under the law of this state.

“Income-withholding order” means an order or other legal process directed to an obligor’s employer or income payer, as defined by section 14-09-09.10, to withhold support from the income of the obligor.

“Initiating tribunal” means the authorized tribunal of a state or foreign country from which a proceeding is forwarded or in which a proceeding is filed for forwarding to another state or foreign country.

“Issuing foreign country” means the country in which a tribunal issues a support order or judgment determining parentage.

“Issuing state” means the state in which a tribunal issues a support order or a judgment determining parentage.

“Issuing tribunal” means the tribunal of a state or foreign country that issues a support order or a judgment determining parentage of a child.

“Law” includes decisional and statutory law and rules having the force of law.

“Obligee” means:

An individual to whom a duty of support is or is alleged to be owed or in whose favor a support order has been issued or a judgment determining parentage has been issued;

A state, a political subdivision of a state, or a foreign country, to which the rights under a duty of support or support order have been assigned or which has independent claims based on financial assistance provided to an individual obligee in place of child support;

An individual seeking a judgment determining parentage of the individual’s child; or

A person that is a creditor in a proceeding subject to sections 14-12.2-47.1 through 14-12.2-47.13.

“Obligor” means an individual, or the estate of a decedent:

Who owes or is alleged to owe a duty of support;

Who is alleged but has not been adjudicated to be a parent of a child;

Who is liable under a support order; or

Who is a debtor in a proceeding subject to sections 14-12.2-47.1 through 14-12.2-47.13.

“Outside this state” means a location in another state or a country other than the United States, whether or not the country is defined as a foreign country.

“Person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.

“Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

“Register” means to file in a tribunal of this state a support order or judgment determining parentage issued in another state or foreign country.

“Registering tribunal” means a tribunal in which a support order or judgment determining parentage is registered.

“Responding state” means a state in which a proceeding is filed or to which a proceeding is forwarded for filing from another state or foreign country.

“Responding tribunal” means the authorized tribunal in a responding state or foreign country.

“Spousal support order” means a support order for a spouse or former spouse of the obligor.

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States. The term includes an Indian nation or tribe.

“Support enforcement agency” means a public official or agency authorized to:

Seek enforcement of support orders or laws relating to the duty of support;

Seek establishment or modification of child support;

Request determination of parentage of a child;

Attempt to locate obligors or their assets; or

Request determination of the controlling child support order.

“Support order” means a judgment, decree, order, decision, or directive, whether temporary, final, or subject to modification, issued in a state or foreign country for the benefit of a child, a spouse, or a former spouse, which provides for monetary support, health care, arrearages, retroactive support, or reimbursement for financial assistance provided to an individual obligee in place of child support. The support order may include related costs and fees, interest, income withholding, automatic adjustment, attorney’s fees, and other relief.

“Tribunal” means a court, administrative agency, or quasi-judicial entity authorized to establish, enforce, or modify support orders or to determine parentage.

“United States” means all states.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 1997, ch. 152, § 1; 2009, ch. 152, § 1.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-02. (102)
State tribunal and support enforcement agency. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The district court is the tribunal of this state.

The department of human services is the support enforcement agency of this state.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 2009, ch. 152, § 2.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-02. (102)
State tribunal and support enforcement agency. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The district court is the tribunal of this state.

The department of health and human services is the support enforcement agency of this state.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 2009, ch. 152, § 2; 2021, ch. 352, § 41, effective September 1, 2022.

14-12.2-03. (104)
Remedies cumulative.

Remedies provided by this chapter are cumulative and do not affect the availability of remedies under other law or the recognition of a support order on the basis of comity.

This chapter does not:

Provide the exclusive method of establishing or enforcing a support order under the law of this state; or

Grant a tribunal of this state jurisdiction to render judgment or issue an order relating to child custody or visitation in a proceeding under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 2009, ch. 152, § 3.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-03.1. (105)
Application of chapter to resident of foreign country and foreign support proceeding.

A tribunal of this state shall apply sections 14-12.2-01 through 14-12.2-46.4 and, as applicable, sections 14-12.2-47.1 through 14-12.2-47.13, to a support proceeding involving:

A foreign support order;

A foreign tribunal; or

An obligee, obligor, or child residing in a foreign country.

A tribunal of this state that is requested to recognize and enforce a support order on the basis of comity may apply the procedural and substantive provisions of sections 14-12.2-01 through 14-12.2-46.4.

Sections 14-12.2-47.1 through 14-12.2-47.13 apply only to a support proceeding subject to the convention. In such a proceeding, if a provision of sections 14-12.2-47.1 through 14-12.2-47.13 is inconsistent with a provision of sections 14-12.2-01 through 14-12.2-46.4, sections 14-12.2-47.1 through 14-12.2-47.13 control.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 152, § 4.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-04. (201)
Bases for jurisdiction over nonresident.

In a proceeding to establish or enforce a support order or to determine parentage of a child, a tribunal of this state may exercise personal jurisdiction over a nonresident individual or the individual’s guardian or conservator if:

The individual is personally served with a summons within this state;

The individual submits to the jurisdiction of this state by consent in a record, by entering a general appearance, or by filing a responsive document having the effect of waiving any contest to personal jurisdiction;

The individual resided with the child in this state;

The individual resided in this state and provided prenatal expenses or support for the child;

The child resides in this state as a result of the acts or directives of the individual;

The individual engaged in sexual intercourse in this state and the child may have been conceived by that act of intercourse; or

There is any other basis consistent with the constitutions of this state and the United States for the exercise of personal jurisdiction.

The bases of personal jurisdiction set forth in subsection 1 or any other law of this state may not be used to acquire personal jurisdiction for a tribunal of this state to modify a child support order of another state unless the requirements of section 14-12.2-45 are met, or, in the case of a foreign support order, unless the requirements of section 14-12.2-46.3 are met.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 2009, ch. 152, § 5.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-05. (202)
Duration of personal jurisdiction.

Personal jurisdiction acquired by a tribunal of this state in a proceeding under this chapter or other law of this state relating to a support order continues as long as a tribunal of this state has continuing, exclusive jurisdiction to modify its order or continuing jurisdiction to enforce its order as provided by sections 14-12.2-08, 14-12.2-09, and 14-12.2-12.2.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 2009, ch. 152, § 6.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-06. (203)
Initiating and responding tribunal of this state.

Under this chapter, a tribunal of this state may serve as an initiating tribunal to forward proceedings to a tribunal of another state and as a responding tribunal for proceedings initiated in another state or foreign country.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 2009, ch. 152, § 7.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-07. (204)
Simultaneous proceedings.

A tribunal of this state may exercise jurisdiction to establish a support order if the petition or comparable pleading is filed after a petition or comparable pleading is filed in another state or foreign country only if:

The petition or comparable pleading in this state is filed before the expiration of the time allowed in the other state or foreign country for filing a responsive pleading challenging the exercise of jurisdiction by the other state or foreign country;

The contesting party timely challenges the exercise of jurisdiction in the other state or foreign country; and

If relevant, this state is the home state of the child.

A tribunal of this state may not exercise jurisdiction to establish a support order if the petition or comparable pleading is filed before a petition or comparable pleading is filed in another state or foreign country if:

The petition or comparable pleading in the other state or foreign country is filed before the expiration of the time allowed in this state for filing a responsive pleading challenging the exercise of jurisdiction by this state;

The contesting party timely challenges the exercise of jurisdiction in this state; and

If relevant, the other state or foreign country is the home state of the child.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 1997, ch. 152, § 2; 2009, ch. 152, § 8.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-08. (205)
Continuing, exclusive jurisdiction to modify child support order.

A tribunal of this state that has issued a child support order consistent with the law of this state has and shall exercise continuing, exclusive jurisdiction to modify its child support order if the order is the controlling order and:

At the time of the filing of a request for modification this state is the residence of the obligor, the individual obligee, or the child for whose benefit the support order is issued; or

Even if this state is not the residence of the obligor, the individual obligee, or the child for whose benefit the support order is issued, the parties consent in a record or in open court that the tribunal of this state may continue to exercise jurisdiction to modify its order.

A tribunal of this state that has issued a child support order consistent with the law of this state may not exercise continuing, exclusive jurisdiction to modify the order if:

All of the parties who are individuals file consent in a record with the tribunal of this state that a tribunal of another state that has jurisdiction over at least one of the parties who is an individual or that is located in the state of residence of the child may modify the order and assume continuing, exclusive jurisdiction; or

Its order is not the controlling order.

If a tribunal of another state has issued a child support order pursuant to the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act or a law substantially similar to that Act which modifies a child support order of a tribunal of this state, tribunals of this state shall recognize the continuing, exclusive jurisdiction of the tribunal of the other state.

A tribunal of this state that lacks continuing, exclusive jurisdiction to modify a child support order may serve as an initiating tribunal to request a tribunal of another state to modify a support order issued in that state.

A temporary support order issued ex parte or pending resolution of a jurisdictional conflict does not create continuing, exclusive jurisdiction in the issuing tribunal.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 1997, ch. 152, § 3; 2009, ch. 152, § 9.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-09. (206)
Continuing jurisdiction to enforce child support order.

A tribunal of this state that has issued a child support order consistent with the law of this state may serve as an initiating tribunal to request a tribunal of another state to enforce:

The order if the order is the controlling order and has not been modified by a tribunal of another state that assumed jurisdiction pursuant to the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act; or

A money judgment for arrears of support and interest on the order accrued before a determination that an order of a tribunal of another state is the controlling order.

A tribunal of this state having continuing jurisdiction over a support order may act as a responding tribunal to enforce the order.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 2009, ch. 152, § 10.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-10. (207)
Determination of controlling child support order.

If a proceeding is brought under this chapter and only one tribunal has issued a child support order, the order of that tribunal controls and must be so recognized.

If a proceeding is brought under this chapter, and two or more child support orders have been issued by tribunals of this state or another state or foreign country with regard to the same obligor and same child, a tribunal of this state having personal jurisdiction over both the obligor and individual obligee shall apply the following rules and by order shall determine which order controls:

If only one of the tribunals would have continuing, exclusive jurisdiction under this chapter, the order of that tribunal controls and must be so recognized.

If more than one of the tribunals would have continuing, exclusive jurisdiction under this chapter:

An order issued by a tribunal in the current home state of the child controls; or

If an order has not been issued in the current home state of the child, the order most recently issued controls.

If none of the tribunals would have continuing, exclusive jurisdiction under this chapter, the tribunal of this state shall issue a child support order, which controls.

If two or more child support orders have been issued for the same obligor and same child, upon request of a party who is an individual or a support enforcement agency, a tribunal of this state having personal jurisdiction over both the obligor and obligee who is an individual shall determine which order controls under subsection 2. The request may be filed with a registration for enforcement or registration for modification pursuant to sections 14-12.2-35 through 14-12.2-46.4, or may be filed as a separate proceeding.

A request to determine which is the controlling order must be accompanied by a copy of every child support order in effect and the applicable record of payments. The requesting party shall give notice of the request to each party whose rights may be affected by the determination.

The tribunal that issued the controlling order under subsection 1, 2, or 3 has continuing jurisdiction to the extent provided in section 14-12.2-08 or 14-12.2-09.

A tribunal of this state that determines by order which is the controlling order under subdivision a or b of subsection 2 or subsection 3 that issues a new controlling order under subdivision c of subsection 2 shall state in that order:

The basis upon which the tribunal made its determination;

The amount of prospective support, if any; and

The total amount of consolidated arrears and accrued interest, if any, under all of the orders after all payments made are credited as provided in by section 14-12.2-12.

Within thirty days after issuance of an order determining which is the controlling order, the party obtaining the order shall file a certified copy of it in each tribunal that had issued or registered an earlier order of child support. A party or support enforcement agency obtaining the order that fails to file a certified copy is subject to appropriate sanctions by a tribunal in which the issue of failure to file arises. The failure to file does not affect the validity or enforceability of the controlling order.

An order that has been determined to be the controlling order, or a judgment for consolidated arrears of support and interest, if any, made pursuant to this section must be recognized in proceedings under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 1997, ch. 152, § 4; 2009, ch. 152, § 11.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides: “

APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

Collateral References.

Validity, Construction, and Application of Full Faith and Credit for Child Support Orders Act (FFCCSOA), 28 USCS § 1738B - State Cases. 18 A.L.R.6th 97.

14-12.2-11. (208)
Child support orders for two or more obligees.

In responding to registrations or petitions for enforcement of two or more child support orders in effect at the same time with regard to the same obligor and different individual obligees, at least one of which was issued by a tribunal of another state or foreign country, a tribunal of this state shall enforce those orders in the same manner as if the orders had been issued by a tribunal of this state.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 2009, ch. 152, § 12.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-12. (209)
Credit for payments.

A tribunal of this state shall credit amounts collected for a particular period pursuant to any child support order against the amounts owed for the same period under any other child support order for support of the same child issued by a tribunal of this or another state or foreign country.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 2009, ch. 152, § 13.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-12.1. (210)
Application of chapter to nonresident subject to personal jurisdiction.

A tribunal of this state exercising personal jurisdiction over a nonresident in a proceeding under this chapter, under other law of this state relating to a support order, or recognizing a foreign support order may receive evidence from outside this state pursuant to section 14-12.2-28, communicate with a tribunal outside this state pursuant to section 14-12.2-29, and obtain discovery through a tribunal outside this state pursuant to section 14-12.2-30. In all other respects, sections 14-12.2-13 through 14-12.2-47.13 do not apply and the tribunal shall apply the procedural and substantive law of this state.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 152, § 14.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-12.2. (211)
Continuing, exclusive jurisdiction to modify spousal support order.

A tribunal of this state issuing a spousal support order consistent with the law of this state has continuing, exclusive jurisdiction to modify the spousal support order throughout the existence of the support obligation.

A tribunal of this state may not modify a spousal support order issued by a tribunal of another state or foreign country having continuing, exclusive jurisdiction over that order under the law of that state or foreign country.

A tribunal of this state that has continuing, exclusive jurisdiction over a spousal support order may serve as:

An initiating tribunal to request a tribunal of another state to enforce the spousal support order issued in this state; or

A responding tribunal to enforce or modify its own spousal support order.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 152, § 15.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-13. (301)
Proceedings under this chapter.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, sections 14-12.2-13 through 14-12.2-31 apply to all proceedings under this chapter.

An individual petitioner or a support enforcement agency may initiate a proceeding authorized under this chapter by filing a petition in an initiating tribunal for forwarding to a responding tribunal or by filing a petition or a comparable pleading directly in a tribunal of another state or foreign country which has or can obtain personal jurisdiction over the respondent.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 2009, ch. 152, § 16.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-14. (302)
Proceeding by minor parent.

A minor parent, or a guardian or other legal representative of a minor parent, may maintain a proceeding on behalf of or for the benefit of the minor’s child.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 2009, ch. 152, § 17.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-15. (303)
Application of law of this state.

Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, a responding tribunal of this state shall:

Apply the procedural and substantive law generally applicable to similar proceedings originating in this state and may exercise all powers and provide all remedies available in those proceedings; and

Determine the duty of support and the amount payable in accordance with the law and support guidelines of this state.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 2009, ch. 152, § 18.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-16. (304)
Duties of initiating tribunal.

Upon the filing of a petition authorized by this chapter, an initiating tribunal of this state shall forward the petition and its accompanying documents:

To the responding tribunal or appropriate support enforcement agency in the responding state; or

If the identity of the responding tribunal is unknown, to the state information agency of the responding state with a request that they be forwarded to the appropriate tribunal and that receipt be acknowledged.

If requested by the responding tribunal, a tribunal of this state shall issue a certificate or other document and make findings required by the law of the responding state. If the responding tribunal is in a foreign country, upon request the tribunal of this state shall specify the amount of support sought, convert that amount into the equivalent amount in the foreign currency under applicable official or market exchange rate as publicly reported, and provide any other documents necessary to satisfy the requirements of the responding foreign tribunal.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 1997, ch. 152, § 5; 2009, ch. 152, § 19.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-17. (305)
Duties and powers of responding tribunal.

When a responding tribunal of this state receives a petition or comparable pleading from an initiating tribunal or directly under subsection 2 of section 14-12.2-13, it shall cause the petition or pleading to be filed and notify the petitioner where and when it was filed.

A responding tribunal of this state, to the extent not prohibited by other law, may do one or more of the following:

Establish or enforce a support order, modify a child support order, determine the controlling child support order, or determine parentage of a child;

Order an obligor to comply with a support order, specifying the amount and the manner of compliance;

Order income withholding;

Determine the amount of any arrearages, and specify a method of payment;

Enforce orders by civil or criminal contempt, or both;

Set aside property for satisfaction of the support order;

Place liens and order execution on the obligor’s property;

Order an obligor to keep the tribunal informed of the obligor’s current residential address, electronic mail address, telephone number, employer, address of employment, and telephone number at the place of employment;

Issue a bench warrant for an obligor who has failed after proper notice to appear at a hearing ordered by the tribunal and enter the bench warrant in any local and state computer systems for criminal warrants;

Order the obligor to seek appropriate employment by specified methods;

Award reasonable attorney’s fees and other fees and costs; and

Grant any other available remedy.

A responding tribunal of this state shall include in a support order issued under this chapter, or in the documents accompanying the order, the calculations on which the support order is based.

A responding tribunal of this state may not condition the payment of a support order issued under this chapter upon compliance by a party with provisions for visitation.

If a responding tribunal of this state issues an order under this chapter, the tribunal shall send a copy of the order to the petitioner and the respondent and to the initiating tribunal, if any.

If requested to enforce a support order, arrears, or judgment or modify a support order stated in a foreign currency, a responding tribunal of this state shall convert the amount stated in the foreign currency to the equivalent amount in dollars under the applicable official or market exchange rate as publicly reported.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 1997, ch. 152, § 6; 2009, ch. 152, § 20.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-18. (306)
Inappropriate tribunal.

If a petition or comparable pleading is received by an inappropriate tribunal of this state, the tribunal shall forward the pleading and accompanying documents to an appropriate tribunal of this state or another state and notify the petitioner where and when the pleading was sent.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 1997, ch. 152, § 7; 2009, ch. 152, § 21.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-19. (307)
Duties of support enforcement agency.

A support enforcement agency of this state, upon request, shall provide services to a petitioner in a proceeding under this chapter.

A support enforcement agency of this state that is providing services to the petitioner shall:

Take all steps necessary to enable an appropriate tribunal of this state or another state or foreign country to obtain jurisdiction over the respondent;

Request an appropriate tribunal to set a date, time, and place for a hearing;

Make a reasonable effort to obtain all relevant information, including information as to income and property of the parties;

Within two days, exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, after receipt of notice in a record from an initiating, responding, or registering tribunal, send a copy of the notice to the petitioner;

Within two days, exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, after receipt of communication in a record from the respondent or the respondent’s attorney, send a copy of the communication to the petitioner; and

Notify the petitioner if jurisdiction over the respondent cannot be obtained.

A support enforcement agency of this state which requests registration of a child support order in this state for enforcement or for modification shall make reasonable efforts:

To ensure that the order to be registered is the controlling order; or

If two or more child support orders exist and the identity of the controlling order has not been determined, to ensure that a request for such a determination is made in a tribunal having jurisdiction to do so.

A support enforcement agency of this state which requests registration and enforcement of a support order, arrears, or judgment stated in a foreign currency shall convert the amounts stated in the foreign currency into the equivalent amounts in dollars under the applicable official or market exchange rate as publicly reported.

A support enforcement agency of this state shall request a tribunal of this state to issue a child support order and an income withholding order that redirect payment of current support, arrears, and interest if requested to do so by a support enforcement agency of another state pursuant to section 14-12.2-31.

This chapter does not create or negate a relationship of attorney and client or other fiduciary relationship between a support enforcement agency or the attorney for the agency and the individual being assisted by the agency.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 1997, ch. 152, § 8; 2009, ch. 152, § 22.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-20. (308)
Duty of attorney general.

If the attorney general determines that the support enforcement agency is neglecting or refusing to provide services to an individual, the attorney general may order the agency to perform its duties under this chapter or may provide those services directly to the individual.

The attorney general may determine that a foreign country has established a reciprocal arrangement for child support with this state and take appropriate action for notification of the determination.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3; 2009, ch. 152, § 23.

Note.

Section 72 of chapter 152, S.L. 2009 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a proceeding commenced on or after the effective date to establish a support order or determine parentage or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior order or agreement, whether issued or entered into before, on, or after the effective date.”

14-12.2-21. (309)
Private counsel.

An individual may employ private counsel to represent the individual in proceedings authorized by this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 3.